Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2917.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 398.34, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Violations; penalties; disposal of fines. Every ordinance relating to any matter specified in subdivision 2 shall have the force and effect of law, and a violation of any provision thereof shall be a misdemeanornew text begin , or an administrative penalty if the county imposes a system of administrative penalties through county ordinancenew text end . The provisions of such ordinances shall not supersede any applicable provision of an ordinance of any city, but shall be supplementary thereto. All fines collected for violations of ordinances enacted hereunder shall be deposited in the county park fund. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end